District of Columbia statutes.
26-1152.13

Limitations on balloon payments.

A lender shall not make a covered loan that provides for a scheduled payment that is more than twice as large as the average of earlier scheduled monthly payments unless the balloon payment becomes due and payable not less than 7 years after the date of the loan closing. This section shall not apply if the payment schedule is adjusted to account for the seasonal or irregular income of the borrower or if the loan is a bridge loan connected with or related to the acquisition or construction of a dwelling intended to become the borrower’s principal dwelling.

May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 213, 49 DCR 2551
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 213 of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).